District of Columbia statutes.
48-904.09

Attempt; conspiracy.

Any person who attempts or conspires to commit any offense defined in this subchapter is punishable by imprisonment or fine or both which may not exceed the maximum punishment prescribed for the offense, the commission of which was the object of the attempt or conspiracy.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 409, 28 DCR 3081
1981 Ed., § 33-549.